District of Columbia statutes.
3-2413

Repealed

Application for license; number of examinations required; reexamination; issuance of license; display

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(d), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-1801 to 2-1822.